Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 2. Purpose and Powers.

Sec. 44.83.070.
Purpose of the authority.

The purpose of the authority is to promote, develop, and advance the general prosperity and economic welfare of the people of the state by providing a means of financing and operating power projects and facilities that recover and use waste energy and by carrying out the powers and duties assigned to it under AS 42.45.

History.

(§ 1 ch 278 SLA 1976; am § 5 ch 156 SLA 1978; am § 1 ch 133 SLA 1982; am § 9 ch 18 SLA 1993; am § 66 ch 58 SLA 1999)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.56.070. Renumbered in 1980.

Sec. 44.83.080.
Powers of the authority.

In furtherance of its corporate purposes, the authority has the following powers in addition to its other powers:

to sue and be sued;

to have a seal and alter it at pleasure;

to make and alter bylaws for its organization and internal management;

to adopt regulations governing the exercise of its corporate powers;

to improve, equip, operate, and maintain power projects and bulk fuel, waste energy, energy conservation, energy efficiency, and alternative energy facilities and equipment;

to issue bonds to carry out any of its corporate purposes and powers, including the establishment or increase of reserves to secure or to pay the bonds or interest on them, and the payment of all other costs or expenses of the authority incident to and necessary or convenient to carry out its corporate purposes and powers;

to sell, lease as lessor or lessee, exchange, donate, convey, or encumber in any manner by mortgage or by creation of any other security interest, real or personal property owned by it, or in which it has an interest, when, in the judgment of the authority, the action is in furtherance of its corporate purposes;

to accept gifts, grants, or loans from, and enter into contracts or other transactions regarding them, with any person;

to deposit or invest its funds, subject to agreements with bondholders;

to enter into contracts with the United States or any person and, subject to the laws of the United States and subject to concurrence of the legislature, with a foreign country or its agencies, for the construction, financing, operation, and maintenance of all or any part of a power project or bulk fuel, waste energy, energy conservation, energy efficiency, or alternative energy facilities or equipment, either inside or outside the state, and for the sale or transmission of power from a project or any right to the capacity of it or for the security of any bonds of the authority issued or to be issued for the project;

to enter into contracts with any person and with the United States and, subject to the laws of the United States and subject to the concurrence of the legislature, with a foreign country or its agencies for the purchase, sale, exchange, transmission, or use of power from a project, or any right to the capacity of it;

to apply to the appropriate agencies of the state, the United States, and a foreign country and any other proper agency for the permits, licenses, or approvals as may be necessary, to acquire, construct, maintain, and operate power projects in accordance with the licenses or permits, and to obtain, hold, and use the licenses and permits in the same manner as any other person or operating unit;

to enter into contracts or agreements with respect to the exercise of any of its powers, and do all things necessary or convenient to carry out its corporate purposes and exercise the powers granted in this chapter;

to recommend to the legislature

the pledge of the credit of the state to guarantee repayment of all or any portion of revenue bonds issued to assist in construction of power projects;

an appropriation from the general fund

for debt service on bonds or other project purposes; or

to reduce the amount of debt financing for the project;

to carry out the powers and duties assigned to it under AS 42.45;

to make grants or loans to any person and enter into contracts or other transactions regarding the grants or loans;

to promote energy conservation, energy efficiency, and alternative energy through training and public education;

to acquire a Susitna River power project, whether by construction, purchase, gift, or lease, including the acquisition of property rights and interests by eminent domain under AS 09;

to perform feasibility studies and engineering and design with respect to power projects.

History.

(§ 1 ch 278 SLA 1976; am §§ 6 — 11 ch 156 SLA 1978; am §§ 16, 17 ch 83 SLA 1980; am § 5 ch 118 SLA 1981; am § 16 ch 161 SLA 1984; am § 10 ch 18 SLA 1993; am § 67 ch 58 SLA 1999; am § 9 ch 36 SLA 2004; am § 18 ch 83 SLA 2010; am § 2 ch 6 FSSLA 2011)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.56.080. Renumbered in 1980.

Administrative Code. —

For administrative provisions, see 3 AAC 105, art. 1.

For operation of projects, see 3 AAC 105, art. 2.

For disposition of assets, see 3 AAC 105, art. 3.

For loan from power project fund, see 3 AAC 106, art. 1.

For loans from rural electrification revolving loan fund, see 3 AAC 106, art. 2.

For loans from bulk fuel revolving loan fund, see 3 AAC 106, art. 3.

For power cost equalization program, see 3 AAC 107, art. 1.

For utility improvements grant program, see 3 AAC 107, art. 2.

For electrical service extension fund grants, see 3 AAC 107, art. 3.

For bulk fuel storage facility and power system upgrades, see 3 AAC 108, art. 1.

For circuit rider maintenance and electrical emergencies programs, see 3 AAC 108, art. 2.

For alternative energy and energy efficiency programs, see 3 AAC 108, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective September 14, 2010, added (17).

The 2011 amendment, effective July 14, 2011, inserted “acquire, construct” near the middle of (12), added (18) and (19), and made a related change.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 36, SLA 2004 (SB 337) making a series of amendments to this chapter, see 2004 Senate Journal 2179 - 2180.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The authority may reimburse a member only for time spent in an actual meeting or time spent on authorized official business incident to his duties as a member. April 19, 1984 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 44.83.085.
Susitna River power project annual report.

The authority shall prepare, not later than the first day of each regular session of the legislature, an annual report summarizing the status of the Susitna River power project and shall notify the legislature that the report is available.

History.

(§ 3 ch 6 FSSLA 2011)

Sec. 44.83.090.
Power contracts and the Regulatory Commission of Alaska.

The authority shall, in addition to the other methods that it may find advantageous, provide a method by which municipal electric, rural electric, cooperative electric, or private electric utilities and regional electric authorities, or other persons authorized by law to engage in the distribution of electricity may secure a reasonable share of the power generated by a project, or any interest in a project, or for any right to the power and shall sell the power or cause the power to be sold at the lowest reasonable prices that cover the full cost of the electricity or services, including capital and operating costs, debt coverage as considered appropriate by the authority, and other charges that may be authorized by this chapter. Except for a contract or lease entered into under former AS

44.83.380

—

44.83.425

, a contract or lease for the sale, transmission, and distribution of power generated by a project or any right to the capacity of it shall provide:

for payment of all operating and maintenance expenses of a project and costs of renewals, replacements, and improvements of it;

for interest on and amortization charges sufficient to retire bonds of the authority issued for the project and reserves for them, plus a debt service coverage factor as may be determined by the authority to be necessary for the marketability of its bonds;

for monitoring of the project by the authority or its agents;

for full and complete disclosure to the authority of all factors of costs in the transmission and distribution of power, so that rates to any persons may be fixed initially in the contract or lease and may be adjusted from time to time on the basis of true cost data;

for periodic revisions of the service and rates to persons on the basis of accurate cost data obtained by the accounting methods and systems approved by the directors and in furtherance and effectuation of the policy declared in this chapter;

for the cancellation and termination of a contract or lease upon violation of its terms by any person;

for security for performance as the authority may consider practicable and advisable, including provisions assuring the continuance of the distribution and transmission of power generated by a project and the use of its facilities for these purposes; and

other terms not inconsistent with the provisions and policy of this chapter as the authority may consider advisable.

The authority is not subject to the jurisdiction of the Regulatory Commission of Alaska. Nothing in this chapter grants the authority jurisdiction over the services or rates of a public utility or diminishes or otherwise alters the jurisdiction of the Regulatory Commission of Alaska with respect to a public utility, including any right the commission may have to review and approve or disapprove contracts for the purchase of electricity by a public utility other than wholesale agreements and contracts described in AS

42.05.431(c)(1)

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 278 SLA 1976; am § 12 ch 156 SLA 1978; am § 6 ch 118 SLA 1981; am § 3 ch 11 SLA 1988; am § 11 ch 18 SLA 1993)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.56.090. Renumbered in 1980.

In 1999, in subsection (b) “Regulatory Commission of Alaska” was substituted for “Alaska Public Utilities Commission” in accordance with § 30(a), ch. 25, SLA 1999.

Sec. 44.83.092.
Authority for municipalities and utilities to enter into power sales contracts.

The authority and any municipality or public or private entity operating an electric utility, or a municipality or private entity and another municipality or private entity, may enter into a contract providing for or relating to the sale of electric power by the authority to the municipality or entity, or by the municipality or entity to another municipality or entity.
The contract may provide

that the amounts payable under the contract are operating expenses of the utility and are valid and binding obligations of the municipality or other entity payable from the gross revenues of the utility;

for one or more appropriations of the amounts payable under the contract;

for the municipality or other entity to assume the obligations of another contracting party in the event of a default by that party;

that after completion of a project the municipality or other entity is obligated to make payments notwithstanding a suspension or reduction in the amount of the power supplied by the project; or

that payments under the contract are not subject to reduction by offset or otherwise.

History.

(§ 3 ch 89 SLA 1983)